Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-1305
Health carrier; covered person; notification; when; written notice; contents; health carrier; duties.

(1)(a) A health carrier shall notify the covered person in writing of the covered person's right to request an external review to be conducted pursuant to section 44-1308, 44-1309, or 44-1310 and include the appropriate statements and information as set forth in subsection (2) of this section at the same time that the health carrier sends written notice of:

(i) An adverse determination upon completion of the health carrier's utilization review process set forth in the Utilization Review Act; and

(ii) A final adverse determination.

(b) As part of the written notice required under subdivision (1)(a) of this section, a health carrier shall include the following, or substantially equivalent, language: We have denied your request for the provision of or payment for a health care service or course of treatment. You may have the right to have our decision reviewed by health care professionals who have no association with us if our decision involved making a judgment as to the medical necessity, appropriateness, health care setting, level of care, or effectiveness of the health care service or treatment you requested by submitting a request for external review to the Director of Insurance (insert address and telephone number of the office of the director).

(c) The director may prescribe by rule and regulation the form and content of the notice required under this section.

(2)(a) The health carrier shall include in the notice required under subsection (1) of this section:

(i) For a notice related to an adverse determination, a statement informing the covered person that:

(A) If the covered person has a medical condition in which the timeframe for completion of an expedited review of a grievance involving an adverse determination as set forth in section 44-7311 would seriously jeopardize the life or health of the covered person or would jeopardize the covered person's ability to regain maximum function, the covered person or the covered person's authorized representative may file a request for an expedited external review to be conducted pursuant to section 44-1309 or 44-1310 if the adverse determination involves a denial of coverage based on a determination that the recommended or requested health care service or treatment is experimental or investigational and the covered person's treating physician certifies in writing that the recommended or requested health care service or treatment that is the subject of the adverse determination would be significantly less effective if not promptly initiated, at the same time the covered person or the covered person's authorized representative files a request for an expedited review of a grievance involving an adverse determination as set forth in section 44-7311, but that the independent review organization assigned to conduct the expedited external review will determine whether the covered person shall be required to complete the expedited review of the grievance prior to conducting the expedited external review; and

(B) The covered person or the covered person's authorized representative may file a grievance under the health carrier's internal grievance process as set forth in section 44-7308, but if the health carrier has not issued a written decision to the covered person or his or her authorized representative within the time allowed for an internal grievance pursuant to section 44-7308 and the covered person or his or her authorized representative has not requested or agreed to a delay, the covered person or his or her authorized representative may file a request for external review pursuant to section 44-1306 and shall be considered to have exhausted the health carrier's internal grievance process for purposes of section 44-1307; and

(ii) For a notice related to a final adverse determination, a statement informing the covered person that:

(A) If the covered person has a medical condition in which the timeframe for completion of a standard external review pursuant to section 44-1308 would seriously jeopardize the life or health of the covered person or would jeopardize the covered person's ability to regain maximum function, the covered person or the covered person's authorized representative may file a request for an expedited external review pursuant to section 44-1309; or

(B) If the final adverse determination concerns:

(I) An admission, availability of care, continued stay, or health care service for which the covered person received emergency services, but has not been discharged from a facility, the covered person or the covered person's authorized representative may request an expedited external review pursuant to section 44-1309; or

(II) A denial of coverage based on a determination that the recommended or requested health care service or treatment is experimental or investigational, the covered person or the covered person's authorized representative may file a request for a standard external review to be conducted pursuant to section 44-1310 or if the covered person's treating physician certifies in writing that the recommended or requested health care service or treatment that is the subject of the request would be significantly less effective if not promptly initiated, the covered person or his or her authorized representative may request an expedited external review to be conducted under section 44-1310.

(b) In addition to the information to be provided pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section, the health carrier shall include a copy of the description of both the standard and expedited external review procedures that the health carrier is required to provide pursuant to section 44-1317 and shall highlight the provisions in the external review procedures that give the covered person or the covered person's authorized representative the opportunity to submit additional information and include any forms used to process an external review.

(c) As part of any forms provided under subdivision (2)(b) of this section, the health carrier shall include an authorization form or other document approved by the director that complies with the requirements of 45 C.F.R. 164.508, by which the covered person, for purposes of conducting an external review under the Health Carrier External Review Act, authorizes the health carrier and the covered person's treating health care provider to disclose protected health information, including medical records, concerning the covered person that are pertinent to the external review.

Laws 2013, LB147, § 5;

Laws 2016, LB840, § 1.
July 21, 2016
Utilization Review Act, see section 44-5416.